District of Columbia statutes.
47-2354

Fees.

The Mayor shall establish a registration fee schedule for commercial vehicles to carry out the purpose of this subchapter. The money generated from the fees shall be placed in a designated account and used to offset the cost of implementing the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-153, § 2(d), 45 DCR 3853
1981 Ed., § 47-2354.